Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 11

Share Insurance Corporation

45-4-1101. Creation.

There is created the state credit union share insurance corporation, a nonprofit membership public corporation, sometimes referred to as “the corporation” in this part.

The corporation may begin operations at any time within one (1) year after March 13, 1974, upon the adoption of articles of incorporation by the duly authorized representatives of not less than nine (9) credit unions chartered and existing under the laws of Tennessee. The articles of incorporation shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of financial institutions, and shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the commissioner; and shall be recorded in the register's office of Hamilton County in which shall be located the principal office of the corporation.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-1835; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1102. Purposes of corporation.

The general purposes of the corporation are to:

Aid and assist any member credit union that is in liquidation or incurs financial difficulty, such as insolvency or lack of liquidity, in order that the shareholdings and deposits of any individual member of a member credit union shall be protected or guaranteed against loss. The primary amount of loss to be protected or guaranteed shall be established from time to time by the corporation with the approval of the commissioner of financial institutions. With the approval of the commissioner, the corporation may, in addition to the primary amount of loss to be protected or guaranteed, establish additional loss protection or guarantees for the benefit of those member credit unions that voluntarily elect to obtain the additional protection, upon the terms and conditions and the payment of fees that the board of directors of the corporation establishes; and

Cooperate with its member credit unions and the commissioner and the appropriate supervisory agency of credit unions that become members under § 45-4-1107(c) or (d), for the purpose of advancing the general welfare of credit unions in this state and in other states where credit unions become members of the corporation.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 2; T.C.A., § 45-1836; Acts 1983, ch. 93, § 4; 1984, ch. 715, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1103. Powers.

The corporation may:

Enter into contracts of any nature including contracts for reinsurance;

Sue and be sued;

Adopt, use and display a corporate seal;

Advance funds in accordance with agreed terms and conditions to aid member credit unions to operate and to meet liquidity requirements;

Upon the written direction of the commissioner, or of the appropriate supervisory authority of any credit union that becomes a member under § 45-4-1107(c) or (d), assume control of the property and business of any member credit union and operate the credit union in accordance with any recommendations the commissioner or other authority may offer;

Assist in the merger, consolidation or liquidation of credit unions;

Receive money or other property from its member credit unions, or any corporation, association or person;

Invest its funds in:

Bonds, notes or securities of the federal government or its agencies;

Investments authorized under § 35-3-120;

Any investment that is lawful for federal credit unions chartered under title 12 of the United States Code;

Obligations of a territory of the United States, a province of the Dominion of Canada, a subdivision or instrumentality of a state or territory of the United States, an authority organized under state law, an interstate compact or by substantially identical legislation adopted by two (2) or more states; provided, that the obligations are general obligation bonds and are given “Investment Grade” ratings by Moodys Investors Service, Inc. or by Standard and Poor's Corporation and are bank eligible investments as defined by the comptroller of the currency;

Obligations of a corporation chartered by the United States or a state of the United States, doing business in the United States; provided, that the investments do not exceed more than ten percent (10%) of the funds invested by the corporation;

Any agency or association organized either as a stock company, mutual association, or membership corporation; provided, that the purposes for which the agency or association is organized are designed to service, aid or otherwise assist credit unions; and

Other investments, other than investments in credit unions or central credit unions that are members of the corporation, that are deemed prudent by the directors, but these other investments shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the funds of the corporation;

Borrow money from any source, upon the terms and conditions that the directors determine, for the purpose of this section;

Purchase in its own name, hold and convey property of any nature;

Receive by assignment or purchase, from its member credit unions, any property of any nature owned by those member credit unions;

Sell, assign, mortgage, encumber or transfer property of any nature; and

Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations for carrying out the purposes of this section.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 3; T.C.A., § 45-1837; Acts 1983, ch. 93, § 4; 1984, ch. 715, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1104. Exclusive use of name — Right to change name.

The corporation shall have the sole right to use the name state credit union share insurance corporation.

The board of directors of the corporation has the right to change the name of the corporation.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 4; T.C.A., § 45-1838; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 4.

45-4-1105. Amendments to articles.

Amendments to the articles, adopted by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the number of member credit unions present at an annual meeting or a special meeting called for that purpose, shall be filed with the commissioner and, if approved by the commissioner, shall become effective upon being filed in the same manner as the original articles.

Any credit union that becomes a member of the corporation under § 45-4-1107(c) or (d) shall be entitled to vote on any proposed amendments arising after the credit union becomes a member, and the credit unions present shall be included when ascertaining whether the requisite two-thirds (2/3) vote of the proposed amendment has been met.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 5; T.C.A., § 45-1839; Acts 1983, ch. 93, § 4.

45-4-1106. Bylaws.

The credit unions that adopt the articles of incorporation under § 45-4-1101 shall also subscribe and submit to the commissioner of financial institutions for approval, the initial bylaws under which the corporation shall operate.

The bylaws may be amended at any regular meeting of the directors, or special meeting of the directors called for that purpose, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the entire board.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-1840; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

45-4-1107. Membership.

Any credit union legally chartered by the state of Tennessee, or any credit union legally chartered by those states eligible for membership under subsection (c), or any credit union chartered by the federal government eligible for membership under subsection (d), may become a member of the corporation upon application by the board of directors of the credit union and approval of the board of directors of the corporation.

Any credit union that becomes a member under subsection (c) or (d) shall have the same privileges, benefits, and obligations of membership as those credit union members chartered under the laws of the state of Tennessee.

At any time after the corporation begins operations, credit unions chartered by other states of the United States may make application for membership in the corporation in either of the following methods:

Upon enactment of statutes in the state in which it is chartered, which provide:

Credit unions of the state may maintain membership in the corporation, or associations or corporations similar to the corporation;

The credit union supervisory authority of the state shall cooperate with the corporation and the commissioner toward the end that the corporation can exercise its powers; and

The member credit union shall comply with the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation and comply with the statutes of the state of Tennessee establishing and governing the corporation; or

By contract if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The commissioner permits the agreement;

The credit union supervisory authority of the domicile state of the credit union applying for membership permits the agreement;

The agreement is lawful under the laws of both the state of Tennessee and the domicile state of the credit union applying for membership;

The corporation by agreement or law has sufficient authority to require the credit union applying for membership to comply with the bylaws and regulations of the corporation; and

The board of directors of the corporation authorizes the contract.

Credit unions chartered by the federal government may make application for membership in the corporation; provided, that the following conditions are satisfied:

The commissioner permits the agreement;

The National Credit Union Association or the supervisory authority of the credit unions chartered by the federal government and applying for membership permits the agreement;

The agreement is lawful under the laws of both the state of Tennessee and the federal government;

The corporation by agreement or law has sufficient authority to require the credit union applying for membership to comply with the bylaws and regulations of the corporation;

The board of directors of the corporation authorizes the contract; and

The credit union supervisory authority of the credit union chartered by the federal government shall agree to furnish to the corporation copies of all examination reports on all credit unions chartered by the federal government that are or become members of the corporation.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 7; 1978, ch. 553, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-1841; Acts 1981, ch. 89, § 2; 1983, ch. 93, §§ 1-3.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1108. Capital contribution — Additions — Special assessments — Dividends.

In order to provide a capital fund for carrying out the purposes of the corporation pursuant to § 45-4-1102, the corporation shall bill and collect from all credit unions accepted for membership an initial capital contribution not to exceed one percent (1%) of all insured shares, accounts, and certificates of the credit union with the approval of the commissioner. The corporation shall annually declare and collect additions to the capital account as the corporation may deem appropriate, except to the extent that refunds have been paid under subsection (b).

The capital contribution of each member credit union shall be refunded to each member credit union when the unencumbered funds of the corporation exceed two percent (2%) of the aggregate total of all shares, accounts and certificates of member credit unions by an amount equal to the aggregate capital contributions of all members, as determined by the annual report of the commissioner or the annual report of the supervisory agency of the credit unions in each state in which credit unions have become members of the corporation under § 45-4-1107(c). A portion of the capital contribution of each member credit union may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, be refunded to each member credit union, though the unencumbered funds of the corporation do not exceed two percent (2%) of the aggregate total of all shares, accounts and certificates of member credit unions by an amount equal to the aggregate capital contributions of all members as determined by the method specified in this section, if the board of directors of the corporation deems a partial refund to be in the best interest of the corporation. These refunds shall be paid to the then existing member credit unions in proportion to their capital contribution.

At the option of the board of directors of the corporation, the corporation may exclude from its calculations of the capital contribution required by subsections (a) and (b), the share holdings and deposits of shareholders and depositors of member credit unions that either are not protected or guaranteed by the corporation or that are in excess of the primary amount of loss to be protected or guaranteed by the corporation pursuant to § 45-4-1102(1).

In the event of potential impairment of the corporation's capital fund, a special assessment to the capital fund may be levied by the corporation with the approval of the commissioner or, in addition or as an alternative to a special assessment, the corporation may issue debt instruments the board of directors of the corporation deems appropriate with the approval of the commissioner.

The corporation may also, subject to the prior approval of the commissioner, declare a dividend from net earnings annually. The dividend shall be paid on the amount of paid-in membership capital as defined in subsection (a). When capital contributions have not been fully paid during the entire preceding dividend period, a proportional part of the dividend may be paid.

In case of the liquidation of this corporation, the funds shall be paid to the then existing member credit unions in proportion to contributions to the capital fund including any special assessments paid.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 8; 1978, ch. 553, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 45-1842; Acts 1982, ch. 603, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 93, § 5; 1984, ch. 715, § 4; 1985, ch. 18, § 1.

Cross-References. Administrative fees to credit union, accounting, §45-4-703.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-4-1109. Administrative fees.

A regular annual administrative fee, not to exceed one percent (1%) of the member credit union's shares, accounts and certificates, shall be levied by the corporation. The corporation may raise, lower or waive the annual administrative fee when the corporation and the commissioner of financial institutions agree that the total funds of the corporation justify or require the change.

At the option of the board of directors of the corporation, the corporation may exclude from its calculation of the administrative fee required by subsection (a) the shareholdings and deposits of shareholders and depositors of member credit unions that either are not protected or guaranteed by the corporation or that are in excess of the primary amount of loss to be protected or guaranteed by the corporation pursuant to § 45-4-1102(1).

The corporation may return to its member credit unions or credit against future annual administrative fees that portion of annual administrative fees paid into the corporation by its members in excess of the corporation's requirements for administrative expenses, losses, loss provisions, retained earnings and reserves. The return or credit of excessive administrative fees may be made by the corporation in accordance with risk rating categories established by the board of directors, or as a proportional part of the administrative fee paid, as the board of directors may deem appropriate.

The basis for calculating the administrative fee due the ensuing year shall be the member credit union's shares, accounts and certificates as of either:

December 31; or

The date, if different, upon which the member credit union's fiscal year ends.

The corporation shall determine, as to each member credit union, which of the dates specified in subdivision (c)(1) shall be used to calculate the member credit union's administrative fee. The corporation shall additionally determine the date the annual administrative fee is due and payable.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 9; 1976, ch. 705, § 1; 1978, ch. 553, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A., § 45-1843; Acts 1981, ch. 89, § 3; 1982, ch. 603, §§ 3, 4; 1984, ch. 715, §§ 5-7; 1985, ch. 18, § 2.

Cross-References. Accounting treatment of amounts paid to corporation, §45-4-703.

45-4-1110. Directors.

The corporation's business shall be conducted by the incorporators who shall serve until the organizational meeting of the corporation, at which time directors shall be elected by the members of the corporation in accordance with the bylaws. Thereafter, the corporation's business shall be conducted by the directors.

Directors shall not be compensated for their services as directors, but may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses in connection with corporation business.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 10; T.C.A., § 45-1844.

45-4-1111. Supervision of corporation.

The corporation is declared to be performing the functions of a credit union and shall be subject to exclusive supervision and an annual examination by the commissioner. A copy of the annual examination report shall be transmitted as soon as practicable to the corporation and to the supervisory agency of each jurisdiction of which one (1) or more credit unions have become members under § 45-4-1107(c) or (d), and the latter also shall be entitled to further information reasonably necessary in connection with the examination.

The corporation shall not be subject to regulation or control by the department of commerce and insurance, and the statutes of the state governing the operation of insurance companies, including, but not limited to, title 56, shall not be applicable to the corporation.

Nothing in this part shall create any liability upon the state for the payment of any funds to any member credit union by reason of the acts or omissions of the corporation created hereunder, nor shall the state be required to pay any loss to any member credit union in the event the corporation shall be unable to pay the loss.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 11; T.C.A., § 45-1845; Acts 1983, ch. 93, § 6.

45-4-1112. Examination of credit unions by corporation — Effect of failure to pay assessments.

The commissioner of financial institutions shall promptly forward to the corporation copies of all examination reports of all member credit unions. The cost of furnishing these copies shall be paid by the corporation.

The corporation, in addition, may require independent audits and investigations of any member credit union in order to learn of the financial condition of the credit union as it relates to share insurance. The audits shall be at the corporation's expense; provided, that the member credit union shall pay the expense of an annual audit as required by the corporation; provided, that the foregoing proviso shall not conflict with the rules of the commissioner.

If the corporation ascertains evidence of carelessness, unsound practices or mismanagement of any member credit union that appears to adversely affect the solvency or liquidity of the credit union or threaten undue loss to the corporation, the corporation may order that corrective actions be taken, or after due notice and hearing, as provided in the bylaws, revoke the credit union's membership in the corporation. The corporation may also recommend to the commissioner or the supervisory agency of the state of each credit union that becomes a member under § 45-4-1107(c) or (d), that the credit union be liquidated.

If any member credit union fails to pay any assessment lawfully required under this part, the corporation shall notify the commissioner or the supervisory agency of the state of each credit union that becomes a member under § 45-4-1107(c) or (d), and the commissioner or the supervisory agency shall forthwith notify the credit union in writing. The failure of the credit union to make the payment within fifteen (15) days after the written notice may subject the credit union to the sanctions set forth in subsection (c).

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 12; T.C.A., § 45-1846; Acts 1981, ch. 89, § 4; 1983, ch. 93, § 4.

45-4-1113. Administrative review.

If a Tennessee credit union is aggrieved by a decision or order of the corporation or the commissioner, or if the corporation is aggrieved by a decision or order of the commissioner or of a supervisory agency, the Tennessee credit union or corporation shall, upon appropriate petition and after due notice, be entitled to a hearing and administrative review by the Tennessee credit union board of appeals, which may stay enforcement of the decisions or orders pending administrative review.

The Tennessee credit union board of appeals shall consist of three (3) members: the commissioner or the commissioner's appointee; one (1) appointee of the corporation; and one (1) appointee of the attorney general and reporter. Directors, officers, and employees of the corporation shall be ineligible to serve on the Tennessee credit union board of appeals. The Tennessee credit union board of appeals shall enact reasonable bylaws and rules of procedure necessary to provide for administrative review.

Judicial review of decisions or orders of the corporation shall not be available unless the aggrieved party has sought administrative review under this section, and a final decision has been made by the credit union board of appeals.

Any action for judicial review shall be pursuant to § 27-8-101 solely upon the record of the board of appeals and shall be brought in a court of general or equity jurisdiction, without the intervention of a jury, within six (6) months after the date of final decision of the credit union board of appeals, and shall be brought only in Hamilton County.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 13; T.C.A., § 45-1847; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 5.

45-4-1114. Exemption from taxation.

The corporation is declared to be performing a public function on behalf of those citizens of the state whose shares and deposits, with respect to which the corporation is organized, are to be protected and to be a public instrumentality of the state of Tennessee for those purposes. Accordingly, the corporation and all properties at any time owned by it, with the exception of real estate properties, and the income therefrom, and all notes, bonds, debentures and other obligations issued by it, and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the state of Tennessee. Also, for purposes of the Tennessee Securities Act of 1980, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, and any amendment thereto or substitution therefor, notes, bonds, debentures and other obligations issued by the corporation shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1974, ch. 577, § 14; T.C.A., § 45-1848.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).